Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 3. Procedure

Aim

of probate procedure is the speedy settlement and adjudication of rights in the property of a decedent to the end that those entitled to share may have the fullest benefit of the right which the law gives them at the earliest moment consonant with due process and orderly procedure. In re Estate of Haddenham, 358 P.2d 706,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1961), (citing); In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

80 Am. Jur. 2d Wills §§ 894 to 897, 899 to 921, 923, 925, 928 to 929, 931, 933, 951, 953, 954, 956 to 958, 963 to 965; 62 Am. Jur. 2d Process §§ 95, 96, 98.

96 C.J.S. Wills § 784.

§ 2-2-301.
Contents of orders and decrees; recording.

Orders and decrees of the court in probate proceedings need not recite the existence of facts or the performance of acts upon which the jurisdiction of the court or judge may depend, but need only contain the matters ordered or adjudged, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. All orders, judgments and decrees of the court shall be entered at length in the proper journal of the court. When a judgment or decree is made setting apart a homestead, confirming a sale, making a distribution of real property, or determining any other matter affecting the title to real property, a certified copy shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the property is situated.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4542; C.S. 1910, § 5458; C.S. 1920, § 6730; Laws 1921, ch. 144, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 88-901; C.S. 1945, § 6-2701; W.S. 1957, § 2-17; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-201

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter” refers to provisions enacted in the original 1890-91 Probate Code and should read “this article” now.

District court's orders need not recite jurisdictional facts.

Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1905).

Presumption facts authorize appointment of special administrator. —

Under this section it will be presumed, in the absence of a showing to the contrary, that the facts authorize a district court in administration proceedings to appoint a special administrator, although the order granting letters of special administration does not show the removal, suspension or resignation of the prior administrator. Lethbridge v. Lauder, 13 Wyo. 9, 76 P. 682,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1904).

Stated in

Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

Davidek v. Wyoming Inv. Co., 77 Wyo. 141, 308 P.2d 941,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1957).

Cited

in

Poston v. Delfelder, 39 Wyo. 163, 270 P. 1068,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1928).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Probate Procedure — Distinctions Between the Probate and Civil Arms of the District Courts,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 241 (1965).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Interest on decree or judgment of probate court allowing a claim against estate or making an allowance for services, 54 ALR2d 814.

§ 2-2-302.
Notice imparted from date of recording.

When it is provided in this chapter that any order or decree of the court shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk, notice is imparted to all persons from the time of recording.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4543; C.S. 1910, § 5459; C.S. 1920, § 6731; R.S. 1931, § 88-902; C.S. 1945, § 6-2702; W.S. 1057, § 2-18; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-202

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter” refers to provisions enacted in the original 1890-91 Probate Code and should read “this article” now.

§ 2-2-303.
Citations; requirements generally; contents.

Citations shall be directed to the person to be cited, signed by the clerk, and issued under the seal of the court, and shall contain:

The title of the proceeding;

A brief statement of the nature of the proceeding; and

A direction that the person cited appear at a time and place specified.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4544; C.S. 1910, § 5460; C.S. 1920, § 6732; R.S. 1931, § 88-903; C.S. 1945, § 6-2703; W.S. 1957, § 2-19; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-203

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 2-2-304.
Citations; issuance.

The citation may be issued by the clerk upon the application of any party, without an order of the judge or commissioner, except in cases in which an order is expressly required by the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4545; C.S. 1910, § 5461; C.S. 1920, § 6733; R.S. 1931, § 88-904; C.S. 1945, § 6-2704; W.S. 1957, § 2-20; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-204; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter” refers to provisions enacted in the original 1890-91 Probate Code and should read “this article”.

Applied

in

Merrill v. District Court, 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1954).

§ 2-2-305.
Citations; service.

The citation shall be served in the same manner as a summons in a civil action.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4546; C.S. 1910, § 5462; C.S. 1920, § 6734; R.S. 1931, § 88-905; C.S. 1945, § 6-2705; W.S. 1957, § 2-21; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-205; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to service of process generally, see §§

1-6-101

to

1-6-301

.

As to service of process by sheriff, see §

18-3-604

.

§ 2-2-306.
Citations; used to give personal notice.

When a personal notice is required, and no mode of giving it is prescribed in this chapter, it shall be given by citation.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 4547; C.S. 1910, § 5463; C.S. 1920, § 6735; R.S. 1931, § 88-906; C.S. 1945, § 6-2706; W.S. 1957, § 2-22; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-206; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “prescribed in this chapter” for “prescribed in this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-1-101

.

Section applies to examination of persons possessing decedent's property. —

The provisions of this section are applicable in proceedings under §

2-7-412

requiring persons believed to be in possession of decedent's property to submit to examination touching such property, since no mode as to giving notice is provided in §§

2-7-412

to

2-7-414

.State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 31 Wyo. 413, 227 P. 378,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 2-2-307.
Citations; when to be served.

When no other time is specially prescribed in this chapter, citations shall be served at least five (5) days before the return day thereof.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 4548; C.S. 1910, § 5464; C.S. 1920, § 6736; R.S. 1931, § 88-907; C.S. 1945, § 6-2707; W.S. 1957, § 2-23; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-207; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

Cross references. —

As to amercement of officer for failure to serve or return process, see §

1-24-103

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “prescribed in this chapter” for “prescribed in this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

§ 2-2-308.
Provisions of Rules of Civil Procedure applicable; parties.

Except as otherwise provided in the Probate Code, the provisions of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure are applicable to and constitute the rules of practice for all proceedings, new trials or appeals. In all proceedings the party affirming is contestant and the one denying or avoiding is contestee.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4550; C.S. 1910, § 5466; C.S. 1920, § 6738; Laws 1921, ch. 144, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 88-909; C.S. 1945, § 6-2709; W.S. 1957, § 2-24; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-208; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,

see

the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated

.

As to procedure when applicant for public land dies before patent is issued, see §

2-9-204

.

Editor's notes. —

Prior to the 1980 revision of title 2, this section provided for the applicability of the Code of Civil Procedure to probate proceedings.

Meaning of “Probate Code.” —

The term “Probate Code” refers to the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

It need not be alleged that funeral expenses are reasonable.

Sowers v. King, 32 Wyo. 167, 231 P. 411,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 32 Wyo. 167, 238 P. 540,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1924).

Modification of judgment after term. —

The provision of §

1-16-401

that the district court may modify its judgment after term for “irregularity in obtaining a judgment or order” was held applicable in probate matters by virtue of this section. In re Estate of Jansen, 76 Wyo. 430, 305 P.2d 422,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1957) (decided prior to 1980 revision).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Wilson, 399 P.2d 1008,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1965).

Quoted

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

§ 2-2-309.
Trial by court or jury.

If no jury is demanded, the court shall try the issues joined. If, on written demand, a jury is called for by either party in a matter triable under W.S.

2-2-308

, one shall be had as in other civil cases.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 4552; C.S. 1910, § 5468; C.S. 1920, § 6740; R.S. 1931, § 88-912; C.S. 1945, § 6-2711; W.S. 1957, § 2-26; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-210; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to trial by jury generally, see Rule 38, W.R.C.P., et seq.

Jury trial on widow's allowances. —

When jury was demanded on trial of claim by widow to have homestead and other property set aside, granting jury trial was proper. In re Kiesel's Estate, 35 Wyo. 300, 249 P. 81,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1926).

Cited

in

Weidenhoft v. Primm, 16 Wyo. 340, 94 P. 453,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1908); In re Barrett's Estate, 22 Wyo. 281, 138 P. 865,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1914).

§ 2-2-310.
Appointment of attorney for minors or nonresidents; compensation; failure to appoint of no effect.

At or before the hearing of petitions and contests for the probate of wills, for letters testamentary or of administration, for sales of real estate and confirmation thereof, settlements, partitions, and distribution of estates, setting apart homesteads, and all other proceedings where all the parties interested in the estate are required to be notified, the court may appoint an attorney-at-law to represent the devisees, legatees, heirs or creditors of the decedent who are minors and have no general guardian in the county, or who are nonresidents of the state, and those interested who, though they are neither minors or nonresidents, are unrepresented. The order shall specify the names of the parties, so far as known, for whom the attorney is appointed. The attorney may receive a fee, to be fixed by the court, for his services, which shall be paid out of the funds of the estate as necessary expenses of administration, and upon distribution may be charged to the party represented by the attorney. If, for any cause, it becomes necessary, the court may substitute another attorney for the one first appointed, in which case the fee shall be proportionately divided. The failure to appoint an attorney will not affect the validity of any of the proceedings.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 4553; C.S. 1910, § 5469; C.S. 1920, § 6741; R.S. 1931, § 88-913; C.S. 1945, § 6-2712; W.S. 1957, § 2-27; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-211; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to actions against executors and administrators for waste, conversion and trespass, see §

2-7-106

.

§ 2-2-311.
Payment of costs.

When it is not otherwise prescribed in this chapter, the district court, or the supreme court on appeal, may order costs to be paid by any party to the proceedings, or out of the assets of the estate. Execution for the costs may issue out of the court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 4554; C.S. 1910, § 5470; C.S. 1920, § 6742; R.S. 1931, § 88-914; C.S. 1945, § 6-2713; W.S. 1957, § 2-28; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-212; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 207.

Cross references. —

As to fees, see §

2-2-401

et seq.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “prescribed in this chapter” for “prescribed in this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of the term “this act,” see §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Discretion of court to require payment only of own costs. —

In will contest proceedings, where the estate of an insane person was larger than that of her deceased husband, which was scarcely large enough to cover the widow's exemptions allowed by law, the trial court did not abuse its discretion in requiring estate of deceased to pay only its own costs. Johnston v. Laird, 48 Wyo. 532, 52 P.2d 1219,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1935).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Allowance as costs, of such items as maps, models, wall charts, photographs, and the like, in probate proceedings, 97 A.L.R.2d 138.

§ 2-2-312.
Service of process on guardian; right of guardian to waive.

Whenever an infant or incompetent person has a guardian of his estate residing in this state, personal service upon the guardian of any process, notice or order of the court concerning the estate of a deceased person in which the ward is interested is equivalent to service upon the ward, and it is the duty of the guardian to attend to the interests of the ward in the matter. The guardian may also appear for his ward and waive any process, notice or order to show cause which an adult or a person of sound mind might waive.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 4555; C.S. 1910, § 5471; C.S. 1920, § 6743; R.S. 1931, § 88-915; C.S. 1945, § 6-2714; W.S. 1957, § 2-29; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-213; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.